Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 5. Issuance of Public Trustee’s Deed, Sheriff’s Deed, and the Nature of Title

38-38-501.
Title vests upon expiration of redemption periods - confirmation deed.

Upon the expiration of all redemption periods allowed to all lienors entitled to redeem under part 3 of this article or, if there are no redemption periods, upon the close of the officer’s business day eight business days after the sale, title to the property sold shall vest in the holder of the certificate of purchase or in the holder of the last certificate of redemption in the case of redemption. Subject to the right to cure and the right to redeem provisions of section 38-38-506 and subject to the provisions of section 38-41-212 (2), such title shall be free and clear of all liens and encumbrances junior to the lien foreclosed. No earlier than ten business days nor later than fifteen business days after both the title vests and the officer has received all statutory fees and costs, the officer shall execute and record a confirmation deed pursuant to section 38-38-502 or 38-38-503 to the holder of the certificate of purchase or, in the case of redemption, to the holder of the last certificate of redemption confirming the transfer of title to the property; except that the officer shall execute and record a confirmation deed prior to the tenth business day after title vests, if the officer has received all statutory fees and costs and notice from the appropriate holder that the certificate will not be assigned. But under no circumstances shall the officer be required to issue a confirmation deed unless the officer has received an order authorizing the sale that meets the requirements of section 38-38-105 (2)(a). Failure of the officer to execute and record such deed or to record the deed within the time specified shall not affect the validity of the deed or the vesting of title.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an officer may not include an assignee as a grantee in a confirmation deed, unless:

The officer has received a copy of the assignment executed in accordance with section 38-38-403 within ten business days after title vests; and

The assignment was dated, signed, and notarized or recorded prior to the time title vests.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1669, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1474, § 28, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1844, § 21, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 720, § 17, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended,(SB 12-030), ch. 96, p. 324, § 12, effective September 1.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-39-110, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-502.
Form of confirmation deed for public trustee’s sale.

[Form Excluded]

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1669, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1924, § 55, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1474, § 29, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1844, § 22, effective January 1, 2008.

Editor’s note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-503.
Form of confirmation deed for sheriff’s sale.

[Form Excluded]

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1670, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1475, § 30, effective January 1, 2008.

Editor’s note:

(1) This section is similar to former § 38-39-108, as it existed prior to 1990.

(2) The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)

38-38-504.
Deed evidence of compliance.

Any deed executed by an officer or other official under this article shall be prima facie evidence of compliance with all statutory requirements for the sale and execution of the deed and evidence of the truth of the recitals contained in the deed.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1672, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1845, § 23, effective January 1, 2008.

Editor’s note:

This section is similar to former § 38-39-109, as it existed prior to 1990.

38-38-505.
Effect of foreclosures as to certain classes of persons.

All deeds of trust executed to a public trustee may be foreclosed by such public trustee in the manner provided by section 38-38-101, notwithstanding the fact that the indebtedness secured may constitute a claim against the estate of a deceased person, a mental incompetent, or an incapacitated person and notwithstanding the death, mental incompetency, or incapacity of one or more of the owners of the property covered by the deed of trust.

Any such foreclosure shall be good against a mental incompetent or incapacitated person and against the heirs-at-law, legatees, devisees, creditors, conservators, guardians, personal representatives, executors, and administrators of any decedent or mental incompetent or incapacitated person and all persons claiming by, through, or under such decedent or mental incompetent or incapacitated person. The public trustee shall give notice of such foreclosure proceedings, as provided by law, to the grantor in the deed of trust foreclosed at the address stated therein, as though living and mentally competent, to all persons having interests then of record, and to the lessee or lessees of the premises as provided in section 38-38-305 (1.5). The public trustee shall not be required to give notice of such foreclosure proceedings to any heir-at-law, legatee, devisee, creditor, conservator, guardian, personal representative, executor, or administrator of any decedent or mental incompetent or incapacitated person or to any person claiming by, through, or under any decedent or mental incompetent or incapacitated person unless the claim or interest of such person then appears of record.

The interest and claim in and to such real estate of all mental incompetents or incapacitated persons and of all persons claiming by, through, or under any mental incompetent, incapacitated person, or decedent, including minors and incapacitated persons, shall be terminated and concluded by such foreclosure unless they redeem from the foreclosure sale within the time prescribed by law.

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1672, § 2, effective October 1; (2) amended, p. 1685, § 6, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1990. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

38-38-506.
Omitted parties - definitions.

As used in this section, “omitted party” means any person who:

Prior to the recording of the notice of election and demand or lis pendens, has either acquired a record interest in the property or has obtained a valid possessory interest and is in actual possession of the property, which interest is junior to the deed of trust or other lien being foreclosed and would otherwise be extinguished by the foreclosure; and

Is not included as a party defendant in a judicial foreclosure action or, if included, is not served with process, or is not served with notice of levy or seizure pursuant to section 13-55-102, C.R.S., or is not notified pursuant to section 38-38-103 of a sale, or is not notified in connection with the legal proceedings contemplated by section 38-38-105.

The interest of an omitted party in the property that is the subject of a sale may be terminated if the omitted party, or anyone claiming by, through, or under an omitted party, in a civil action commenced at any time by any interested person as defined in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2), by an omitted party, or by anyone claiming by, through, or under an omitted party, is afforded rights of cure if the omitted party would have been entitled to cure pursuant to section 38-38-104, or is afforded redemption rights if the omitted party would have been entitled to redeem pursuant to section 38-38-302, upon such terms as the court may deem equitable under the circumstances, which terms shall not, however, be more favorable than the person’s statutory rights. The court shall give full consideration to whether the omitted party or anyone claiming by, through, or under an omitted party was given or had actual notice or knowledge of the foreclosure and was given an opportunity to exercise statutory rights to cure or redeem.

For purposes of this section, the lien that is the subject of the sale shall not be extinguished by merger with the title to the property acquired pursuant to section 38-38-501 until the interest of any omitted party has been affirmed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or has been terminated as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), or by operation of law. The omitted party, or anyone claiming by, through, or under an omitted party, cannot extinguish the lien that is subject to the sale by enforcement of the lien of the omitted party.

As used in this section, “interested person” means the holder of the evidence of debt being foreclosed, a holder of a certificate of purchase or certificate of redemption issued pursuant to section 38-38-401 or 38-38-402, or an owner of the property pursuant to section 38-38-501 or a person claiming by, through, or under such holder or owner.

An omitted party, or anyone claiming by, through, or under an omitted party, shall not have a remedy to cure or redeem, except as set forth in this subsection (2). An interested party shall not be able to extinguish an omitted party’s interest except as set forth in this subsection (2) or by written waiver or agreement signed by the omitted party or anyone claiming by, through, or under an omitted party.

If an interested person files with the officer at any time a document affirming an omitted party’s interest in the property, subject to the terms, conditions, and provisions of the recorded instrument from which such omitted party’s interest is derived, or in the case of an omitted party that is a lessee, subject to the terms and conditions of the lease, whether written or oral, the interest of such omitted party in the property shall not be affected by the foreclosure, and such omitted party shall have no right to cure or redeem.

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2006, p. 1476, § 31;

L

. 2007, p. 1849, § 27, effective January 1, 2008.)

History.

Source:
L. 90:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1672, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1476, § 31, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2009:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended and (2)(d) added,(HB 09-1207), ch. 164, p. 720, § 18, effective January 1, 2010.

Editor’s note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)